Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.155

Annexation approval—Other action not authorized.

Boundary review board approval, or modification and approval, of a proposed annexation by a city, town, or special purpose district shall authorize annexation as approved and shall not authorize any other annexation action.

[ 1989 c 84 s 16.]